Louisiana, session 2026, SB161.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
6 Section 1. R.S. 42:31 is hereby repealed in its entirety.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 1 of 1
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.